Idaho, session 2025, H0064.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 72-319, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
72-319. PENALTY FOR FAILURE TO SECURE COMPENSATION. (1) Any employer
required to secure the payment of compensation under this law who fails to
secure the payment thereof shall be guilty of a misdemeanor. In any case
where the employer is a corporation or a limited liability company, any offi-
cer or employee of the corporation or member, manager, or employee of a lim-
ited liability company who had authority to secure payment of compensation
on behalf of the corporation or limited liability company and failed to do so
shall individually be guilty of a misdemeanor.
(2) Such officer, employee, member, or manager shall be personally li-
able jointly and severally with such corporation or limited liability com-
pany for any compensation which that may accrue under this law in respect to
any injury or occupational disease suffered by any employee of such corpora-
tion or limited liability company while it shall so fail to secure the pay-
ment of compensation.
(3) Any employer who knowingly transfers, sells, encumbers, assigns,
or in any manner disposes of, conceals, secretes or destroys any property or
records belonging to such employer, after one (1) of its employees has been
afflicted by an injury or occupational disease, with intent to avoid the pay-
ment of compensation to such employee or his dependents, shall be guilty of a
misdemeanor. In any case where such employer is a corporation or limited li-
ability company, any officer, employee, member, or manager thereof, if know-
ingly participating or acquiescing in any such act, shall also be individu-
ally guilty of a misdemeanor.
(4) Any employer required to secure the payment of compensation under
this law, who fails to do so, may be liable for a penalty of either two dollars
($2.00) for each employee for each day or twenty-five dollars ($25.00) for
each day during which such failure continues, whichever is greater, and in
cases where the employer is a corporation or limited liability company and is
unable to pay the fine, any officer or employee of the corporation or member
or manager of a limited liability company who had authority to secure pay-
ment of compensation on behalf of the corporation or a limited liability com-
pany and failed to do so, shall be liable for a like penalty, to be recovered
for the time during which such failure continued, but for not more than three
(3) consecutive years, in an action brought by the commission in the name of


the state of Idaho; any amount so collected shall be paid into the industrial
administration fund; for this purpose, the district court of any county in
which the employer carries on any part of its trade or occupation shall have
jurisdiction. In determining whether penalties should be assessed or col-
lected for the employer's failure to secure the payment of compensation, the
commission may consider the following factors:
(a) When the employer was notified that such employer's worker's com-
pensation insurance coverage had been cancelled canceled or that such
insurance was required;
(b) The length of time that elapsed between when the employer was no-
tified that worker's compensation insurance coverage was required, or
that such employer's coverage had been cancelled canceled, and the date
that such coverage was put into effect;
(c) Whether the employer is able to document attempts to secure
worker's compensation insurance coverage during the period of time that
such employer was without such coverage;
(d) Whether there were prior instances in which the employer failed
to keep worker's compensation insurance in effect or such coverage was
cancelled, canceled and the reasons for such failure or cancellation;
(e) The reasons that the employer is unable to obtain or keep in effect
worker's compensation insurance coverage;
The above factors are not exclusive and the commission may consider any other
relevant factor.
(5) If any employer required to secure the payment of compensation un-
der this law is or has been in default under section 72-301, Idaho Code, the
employer may be enjoined by the district court of any county in which such em-
ployer carries on any part of its trade or occupation from carrying on such
business while any default under section 72-301, Idaho Code, exists. All
proceedings in the courts under this section are to be brought by the indus-
trial commission in the name of the state of Idaho.
(6) An employer who fails to secure the payment of compensation and who
has been assessed a penalty within the previous three (3) years pursuant to
section 72-319(4), Idaho Code, shall be liable for the following penalty in
addition to the penalty provided by section 72-319(4), Idaho Code:
(a) Five hundred dollars ($500) for the second failure to secure the
payment of compensation;
(b) One thousand dollars ($1,000) for the third and any subsequent
failure to secure the payment of compensation.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.